Wisconsin, session 2025, SB53.
do enact as follows:SB53,11Section 1. 1.14 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB53,2,321.14 (title) Display of flag and national motto at public buildings, 3structures, and facilities.SB53,24Section 2. 1.14 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB53,2,1051.14 (3) Within 6 months of the effective date of this subsection .... [LRB 6inserts date], each state agency, state authority, and local governmental unit shall 7ensure that the national motto, “In God We Trust” is displayed at each building that 8is owned or occupied entirely by the agency, authority, or local governmental unit. 9The agency, authority, or unit shall ensure that the display satisfies all of the 10following:SB53,2,1111(a) It is at least 11 inches by 14 inches.SB53,2,1212(b) It is on a poster, in a framed document, or inscribed on a wall.SB53,2,1313(c) The national motto is in English and is in a legible font.SB53,2,1714(d) If the building, structure, or facility is open to the public, the display is in 15a location that is visible to the visiting public. If the building, structure, or facility 16is not open to the public, the display is posted in a location where notices to 17employees are customarily posted.SB53,318Section 3. 118.06 (title) of the statutes is amended to read:SB53,2,2019118.06 (title) Flag, pledge of allegiance, national motto, and national 20anthem.SB53,421Section 4. 118.06 (3) of the statutes is created to read:SB53,3,422118.06 (3) (a) Beginning in the 2026-27 school year, each school board and 1governing board of a charter school shall cause the national motto, “In God We 2Trust”, to be displayed in each classroom of each school under its control. Except as 3provided in par. (b), the school board or governing board shall determine the nature 4of the display.SB53,3,65(b) A school board or governing board of a charter school shall ensure that a 6display of the national motto under par. (a) satisfies all of the following:SB53,3,771. It is at least 11 inches by 14 inches.SB53,3,882. It is on a poster, in a framed document, or inscribed on a wall.SB53,3,993. The national motto is in English and is in a legible font.SB53,3,1010